Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116P.09, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Conflict of interest. (a) A commission member, a technical advisory committee member, a peer reviewer, or an employee of the commission may not participate in or vote on a decision of the commission, advisory committee, or peer review relating to an organization in which the member, peer reviewer, or employee has either a direct or indirect personal financial interest. While serving on the commission or technical advisory committee or as a peer reviewer or while an employee of the commission, a person must avoid any potential conflict of interest. (b) A commission member may not deleted text begin vote on a motion regarding the purchase of land under section 116P.18 or the final recommendations of the commission required under section 116P.05, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), if the motion relates to an organization in which the member has a direct personal financial interest. If a commission member is prohibited from voting under this paragraph, the number of affirmative votes required under section 116P.05, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), or section 116P.18 is reduced by the number of members ineligible to vote under this paragraphdeleted text end new text begin serve as a project manager for or receive financial or other compensation from a proposal that is being reviewed by the commission or receiving money from the trust fundnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116P.18, is amended to read: 116P.18 LANDS IN PUBLIC DOMAIN. Money appropriated from the trust fund must not be used to purchase any land in fee title or a permanent conservation easement if the land in question is fully or partially owned by the state or a political subdivision of the state or was acquired fully or partially with state money, unless: (1) the purchase creates additional direct benefit to the protection, conservation, preservation, and enhancement of the state's air, water, land, fish, wildlife, and other natural resources; and (2) the purchase is approved, prior to the acquisition, by an affirmative vote of at least 11 members of the commissiondeleted text begin , except as provided under section 116P.09, subdivision 6, paragraph (b)deleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following enactment. new text end